Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1548.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 475C.612 is amended to read:
475C.612. (1) As is necessary to protect the public health and safety, and in consultation with
the Oregon Health Authority and the State Department of Agriculture, the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission shall adopt rules establishing standards for the packaging of marijuana items,
including but not limited to:
(a) Ensuring that cannabinoid concentrates and extracts, cannabinoid edibles and other
cannabinoid products are:
(A) Packaged in child-resistant safety packaging; and
(B) Not marketed in a manner that:
(i) Is untruthful or misleading;
(ii) Is likely to cause minors to unlawfully possess or consume cannabinoid concentrates,
cannabinoid extracts, cannabinoid edibles or other cannabinoid products, in order to prevent the
unlawful possession or consumption of cannabinoid products by minors; or
(iii) Otherwise creates a significant risk of harm to public health and safety;
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 289

A-Eng. SB 1548
(b) Ensuring that usable marijuana, including usable marijuana that is pre-rolled, is not mar-
keted in a manner that:
(A) Is untruthful and misleading;
(B) Is likely to cause minors to unlawfully possess or consume usable marijuana, in order to
prevent the unlawful possession or consumption of usable marijuana by minors; or
(C) Otherwise creates a significant risk of harm to public health and safety; and
(c) In order to prevent the unlawful possession or consumption of cannabinoid edibles and other
cannabinoid products by minors, ensuring that cannabinoid edibles and other cannabinoid products
are not packaged in a manner that is likely to cause minors to unlawfully possess or consume
cannabinoid edibles and other cannabinoid products.
(2) In adopting rules under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919, the authority shall require all usable
marijuana, cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts transferred by a med-
ical marijuana dispensary registered under ORS 475C.833 to be packaged in accordance with sub-
section (1) of this section and rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) In adopting rules under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, the commission shall require all usable
marijuana, cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts sold or transferred by
a marijuana retailer that holds a license under ORS 475C.097 to be packaged in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section and rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) In adopting rules under subsection (1) of this section, the commission:
(a) May establish different packaging standards for different varieties of usable marijuana and
for different types of cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts.
(b) May establish different minimum packaging standards for persons registered under ORS
475C.770 to 475C.919 and persons licensed under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525.
(c) May consider the effect on the environment of requiring certain packaging.
(d) Shall consider the cost of a potential requirement and how that cost will affect the cost to
the ultimate consumer of the marijuana item.
(e) In order to prevent the unlawful possession or consumption of marijuana items by minors,
shall describe, using objective criteria, packaging that is likely to cause minors to unlawfully pos-
sess or consume marijuana items. The objective criteria must include, but is not limited to, prohib-
iting packaging that uses imagery or characters primarily associated with minors when such
associations are likely to result in minors unlawfully possessing or consuming marijuana items.
(f) Must require that each cannabinoid edible contained in a package of cannabinoid
edibles be individually wrapped. The rules adopted under this paragraph do not apply to a
cannabinoid edible that is a potable liquid.
[(f)] (g) May not adopt rules that are more restrictive than is reasonably necessary to protect
the public health and safety.
SECTION 2. ORS 475C.620 is amended to read:
475C.620. (1) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, in consultation with the Oregon
Health Authority and the State Department of Agriculture, shall adopt rules establishing:
(a) The maximum concentration of total delta-9-THC that is permitted in a single serving of a
cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate or extract;
(b) The maximum concentration of adult use cannabinoid, any other cannabinoid or artificially
derived cannabinoid that is permitted in a single serving of a cannabinoid product or a cannabinoid
concentrate or extract; and
(c) The number of servings that are permitted in a package of cannabinoid product or
[2]

A-Eng. SB 1548
cannabinoid concentrate or extract.
(2)(a) In adopting rules under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, the commission shall pre-
scribe the different levels of concentration of total delta-9-THC, artificially derived cannabinoids,
adult use cannabinoids or any other cannabinoid that is permitted in a single serving of a
cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate or extract for:
(A) Consumers who hold a valid registry identification card issued under ORS 475C.783; and
(B) Consumers who do not hold a valid registry identification card issued under ORS 475C.783.
(b) In prescribing the levels of concentration of total delta-9-THC, artificially derived
cannabinoids, adult use cannabinoids or any other cannabinoid that is permitted in a single serving
of a cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate or extract for consumers who hold a valid
registry identification card issued under ORS 475C.783, the commission shall consider the appropri-
ate level of concentration necessary to mitigate the symptoms or effects of a debilitating medical
condition, as defined in ORS 475C.777.
(3) In adopting rules under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919, the authority shall adopt by rule re-
quirements established by the commission by rule to require all usable marijuana, cannabinoid pro-
ducts and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts transferred by a medical marijuana dispensary
registered under ORS 475C.833 to meet the concentration standards and servings per package stan-
dards adopted by rule pursuant to this section.
(4)(a) In adopting rules under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, the commission shall require all usable
marijuana, cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts sold or transferred by
a marijuana retailer that holds a license under ORS 475C.097 to meet the concentration standards
and servings per package standards adopted by rule pursuant to this section.
(b) The rules adopted by the commission under this subsection must:
(A) Allow for a concentration of up to 100 milligrams of adult use cannabinoid per package of
cannabinoid edibles.
(B) Allow for a concentration of up to 10 milligrams of adult use cannabinoid per indi-
vidual cannabinoid edible.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 475C.612 and 475C.620 by sections 1 and 2 of this
2026 Act apply to marijuana items sold or transferred to the final consumer on or after
January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. (1) The amendments to ORS 475C.612 and 475C.620 by sections 1 and 2 of this
2026 Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may take any action before the opera-
tive date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the commis-
sion, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, to exercise
the duties, functions and powers conferred on the commission by the amendments to ORS
475C.612 and 475C.620 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

[3]